csv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_CNJ_m.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziiwegwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanziinigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziiwaagwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziinigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+NA: minongwaanziiwaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+NA: minongwaanziiwangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+NA: minongwaanziiwiingen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+NA: minongwaamowaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+NA: minongwaamowegwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+NA: minongwaamowanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaagwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminigwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamogwen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+NA: minongwaamowaangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+NA: minongwaamowangen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+NA: minongwaamowiingen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwaambaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziiwegibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziiwambanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanziinigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanziiwaagobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanziinigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanziigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+NA: minongwaanziiwaangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+NA: minongwaanziiwangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+NA: minongwaanziiwiingibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+NA: minongwaamowaambaanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+NA: minongwaamowegibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+NA: minongwaamowambanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaagobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminigobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaamogobanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+NA: minongwaamowaangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+NA: minongwaamowangibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+NA: minongwaamowiingibanen
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziwaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziweg
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziwan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanzinig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanzigwaa
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanzinig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanzig
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+NA: minongwaanziwaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+NA: minongwaanziwang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+NA: minongwaanzing
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+NA: minongwaamaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+NA: minongwaameg
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+NA: minongwaaman
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminid
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaad
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminid
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+NA: minongwaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+NA: minongwaamaang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+NA: minongwaamang
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+NA: minongwaaming
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+NA: minongwaanziwaambaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+NA: minongwaanziwegiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+NA: minongwaanziwamban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaanzinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaanzigwaaban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaanzinigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaanzigoban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+NA: minongwaanziwaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+NA: minongwaanziwangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+NA: minongwaanzingiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+NA: minongwaamaambaan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+NA: minongwaamegiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+NA: minongwaamamban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+NA: minongwaaminipan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+NA: minongwaamowaapan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+NA: minongwaaminipan
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+NA: minongwaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+NA: minongwaamaangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+NA: minongwaamangiban
     minongwaam+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+NA: minongwaamingiban
